District of Columbia statutes.
31-1346

Disposition of records during and after termination of liquidation.

Whenever it shall appear to the Commissioner that the records of any insurer in process of liquidation or completely liquidated are no longer useful, he or she may recommend to the court, and the court shall direct, what records should be retained for future reference and what records should be destroyed.

Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-35, § 47, 40 DCR 5773
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(z)(2), 44 DCR 1730

History

1981 Ed., § 35-2846.

Prior Codifications